Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Copyright owner" means the owner of a copyright of a nondramatic musical work recognized and enforceable under the copyright laws of the United States pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code (17 U.S.C. Sec. 101 et seq.). "Copyright owner" does not include the owner of a copyright in a motion picture or audiovisual work, or in part of a motion picture or audiovisual work.

(2) "Music licensing agency" means a performing rights society.

(3) "Performing rights society" means an association or corporation that licenses the public performance of nondramatic musical works on behalf of copyright owners, such as the American Society of Composers, Authors and Publishers (ASCAP), Broadcast Music, Inc. (BMI), and SESAC, Inc.

(4) "Proprietor" means the owner of a retail establishment, restaurant, inn, bar, tavern, sports or entertainment facility, or any other similar place of business or professional office located in this state in which the public may assemble and in which nondramatic musical works or similar copyrighted works may be performed, broadcast, or otherwise transmitted for the enjoyment of members of the public there assembled.

(5) "Royalty" or "royalties" means the fees payable to a copyright owner or performing rights society for the public performance of nondramatic musical works or other similar works.

[ 2016 c 38 s 1.]